Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB585.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1921(c)(8) of Title 1 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1921. Legislative intent controls.* * *(c) Matters considered in ascertaining intent.--When the words of a statute are not explicit, the intention of the General Assembly may be ascertained by considering, among other matters:* * *(8) Legislative [and administrative] interpretations of such statute.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.1234567891011121314151617